District of Columbia statutes.
3-1404

Repealed

Board members qualifications; terms of office; removal; compensation.

Repealed.

Aug. 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-152, § 5, 41 DCR 4636
Sept. 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-188, § 601(a), 41 DCR 5333
Mar. 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-246, § 8(c), 42 DCR 452
July 20, 1996, D.C. Law 11-145, § 2, 43 DCR 2842
June 6, 1998, D.C. Law 12-115, § 2, 45 DCR 1957
June 12, 1999, D.C. Law 12-285, § 4(b), 46 DCR 1355
Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-213, § 9, 49 DCR 8140
Jan. 29, 2008, D.C. Law 17-84, § 2, 54 DCR 11891
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 221, 56 DCR 1117
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2082(j), 57 DCR 181
1981 Ed., § 2-4004.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Omnibus Sports Consolidation Act of 1994 Temporary Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 11-67, October 26, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 6172).
Section 2 of D.C. Law 17-48, in subsec. (a), substituted “13” for “11”, “9” for “8”, and “with similar responsibilities, and a District government official designated by the Mayor,” for “with similar responsibilities,”.
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 17-48 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 8 (c) of the Recreation Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-20, February 28, 1995, 42 DCR 1175).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2 of the Omnibus Sports Consolidation Act of 1994 Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-102, July 21, 1995, 42 DCR 4009).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(a) and (b) of the Omnibus Sports Consolidation Act Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-275, May 29, 1996, 43 DCR 2966).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 4(b) of the Confirmation Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-25, March 15, 1999, 46 DCR 2971).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 4(b) of the Confirmation Act Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-92, June 4, 1999, 46 DCR 5330).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 4(b) of the Confirmation Act Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-92, June 4, 1999, 46 DCR 5330).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Omnibus Sports Consolidation Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-76, July 25, 2007, 54 DCR 7628).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Omnibus Sports Consolidation Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-151, October 18, 2007, 54 DCR 10898).
For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 2082(j) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 2082(j) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
Construction of Law 10-152: See note to § 3-1401.